Missouri, session 2026, SB886.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 160.665 and 590.207, RSMo, are
repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 135.1300, 160.665, and 590.207, to read as
follows:
135.1300. 1. As used in this section, unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Eligible entity", any organization that provides
an eligible course;
(2) "Eligible course", any tactical or defensive
firearms safety and training course identified as an
eligible course according to criteria to be developed by the
department of public safety;
(3) "Firearm", as such term is defined in section
571.010;
(4) "State tax liability", any liability incurred by a
taxpayer pursuant to the provisions of chapter 143,
exclusive of the provisions relating to the withholding of
tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to 143.265 and
related provisions;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 886 2
(5) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise
due under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed
under sections 143.191 to 143.265;
(6) "Taxpayer", any teacher, administrative personnel,
or athletic coach employed by a school, as such term is
defined in section 160.665, that is subject to the tax
imposed under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed
under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2026, a taxpayer shall be authorized to claim a tax credit
against the taxpayer's state tax liability in an amount
equal to one hundred percent of any costs incurred for the
purchase of a firearm or costs incurred for the purchase of
an eligible course from an eligible entity, provided that no
taxpayer may claim a tax credit in excess of one hundred
fifty dollars.
3. (1) Tax credits authorized pursuant to this
section shall not be refundable, but may be carried forward
for five subsequent tax years or until the full tax credit
is redeemed, whichever occurs first.
(2) Tax credits authorized pursuant to this section
may be transferred, sold, or assigned.
(3) The total amount of tax credits that may be
authorized pursuant to this section in any tax year shall
not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.
4. The department of public safety shall establish
criteria defining an eligible course and shall post such
criteria and a list of eligible courses on the department of
public safety's website. The department of public safety
shall additionally submit such criteria and list to the
department of revenue.

SB 886 3
5. The department of revenue may promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset six years after the effective
date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
section is sunset.
160.665. 1. [Any school district within the state may
designate one or more elementary or secondary school
teachers or administrators as a school protection officer.]

SB 886 4
(1) This section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Keep Our Schools Safe Act".
(2) As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(a) "Extracurricular activity", any program or
activity for students that is sponsored, provided, or in any
way facilitated by the school or an organization sanctioned
by the school, including, but not limited to, athletic
events, fine arts activities, career and technical student
organization activities, or any activity designed to enhance
the school curriculum;
(b) "Law enforcement officer", any officer or employee
of the United States, any state, any political subdivision
of a state, or the District of Columbia having both the
power and duty to make arrests for violations of the laws of
this state, and federal law enforcement officers authorized
to carry firearms and to make arrests for violations of the
laws of the United States. The term "law enforcement
officer" shall specifically include, but not be limited to,
members of the following:
a. The National Guard as defined in 10 U.S.C. Section
101, as amended;
b. The organized militia of any state or territory of
the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the
District of Columbia, not included within the definition of
the National Guard as defined in 10 U.S.C. Section 101, as
amended; and
c. The Armed Forces of the United States;
(c) "School", any school district, as such term is
defined in section 160.011, any charter school, as such term
is defined in section 160.400, or any private school, as
such term is defined in section 166.700;

SB 886 5
(d) "School building", any facility owned or leased by
a school:
a. Over which the governing body of the school has
care, custody, or control; and
b. In which any pupils are physically present during a
school day, as such term is defined in section 160.041;
(e) "School campus", a school building or cluster of
buildings, and the grounds around such school building or
cluster of buildings, used for any school purpose,
including, but not limited to, academic instruction,
extracurricular activities, organized physical activity
courses, early childhood education programs, or school
administration;
(f) "School protection officer", any elementary or
secondary school teacher or administrator designated to
serve as a school protection officer under this section and
sections 590.200 to 590.207, or any individual who is a
volunteer as provided in this section;
(g) "Volunteer", any individual who:
a. Was formerly employed as a law enforcement officer
but who has retired from such employment;
b. Is qualified as a school protection officer under
sections 590.200 to 590.207; and
c. Serves or will serve a school as a school
protection officer on a paid or unpaid basis but not as an
employee of the school district.
2. Each school within the state shall designate one or
more school protection officers to be present on each school
campus that is under the custody, care, or control of the
school at all times when children are on the school campus
for educational purposes or extracurricular activities.
Each school protection officer shall be trained as required

SB 886 6
pursuant to the provisions of this section and sections
590.200 to 590.207 and shall be equipped with a concealed
firearm and self-defense spray device. A school protection
officer may be a teacher or administrator as provided in
this section or may be a volunteer. If a school protection
officer is a teacher or administrator, the responsibilities
and duties of a school protection officer are voluntary and
shall be in addition to the normal responsibilities and
duties of the teacher or administrator. [Any compensation
for additional duties relating to service as a school
protection officer shall be funded by the local school
district, with no state funds used for such purpose] If the
school protection officer is a volunteer, the individual may
serve on an unpaid basis or may be provided compensation by
the school.
[2.] 3. Any [person] individual designated by a school
[district] as a school protection officer shall [be
authorized to] carry a concealed [firearms or] firearm and a
self-defense spray device in [any] the school [in the
district]. A self-defense spray device shall mean any
device that is capable of carrying, and that ejects,
releases, or emits, a nonlethal solution capable of
incapacitating a violent threat. The school protection
officer shall not be permitted to allow any firearm or
device out of [his or her] the officer's personal control
while that firearm or device is on the school [property]
campus. Any school protection officer who violates this
subsection may be removed immediately from the [classroom]
school campus and subject to employment termination
proceedings if the officer is a teacher or administrator, or
subject to removal from the school campus and dismissal as a

SB 886 7
volunteer if serving as a volunteer school protection
officer.
100 [3.] 4. A school protection officer has the same
101 authority to detain or use force against any person on
102 school property as provided to any other person under
103 chapter 563.
104 [4.] 5. Upon detention of a person under this
105 subsection [3 of this section], the school protection
106 officer shall immediately notify a school administrator and
107 a school resource officer, if such officer is present at the
108 school. If the person detained is a student then the
109 parents or guardians of the student shall also be
110 immediately notified by a school administrator.
111 [5.] 6. Any person detained by a school protection
112 officer shall be turned over to a school administrator or
113 law enforcement officer as soon as practically possible and
114 shall not be detained by a school protection officer for
115 more than one hour.
116 [6.] 7. Any teacher or administrator of an elementary
117 or secondary school who seeks to be designated as a school
118 protection officer shall request such designation in
119 writing, and submit it to the superintendent of the school
120 district which employs [him or her] such individual as a
121 teacher or administrator. Along with this request, any
122 teacher or administrator seeking to carry a concealed
123 firearm on school property shall also submit proof that [he
124 or she] such individual has a valid concealed carry
125 endorsement or permit, and all teachers and administrators
126 seeking the designation of school protection officer shall
127 submit a certificate of school protection officer training
128 program completion from a training program approved by the
129 director of the department of public safety which

SB 886 8
130 demonstrates that such person has successfully completed the
131 training requirements established by the POST commission
132 under chapter 590 for school protection officers.
133 [7.] 8. No school [district may] shall designate [a
134 teacher or administrator] any individual as a school
135 protection officer unless such [person] individual has
136 successfully completed a school protection officer training
137 program[, which] that has been approved by the director of
138 the department of public safety. No school [district] shall
139 allow a school protection officer to carry a concealed
140 firearm on school property unless the school protection
141 officer has a valid concealed carry endorsement or permit.
142 [8.] 9. (1) Any school [district] that designates a
143 [teacher or administrator as a] school protection officer
144 shall, within thirty days of such designation, notify, in
145 writing, the director of the department of public safety of
146 the designation, which shall include the following:
147 [(1)] (a) The full name, date of birth, and address of
148 the officer;
149 [(2)] (b) The name of the school district; and
150 [(3)] (c) The date such [person] individual was
151 designated as a school protection officer.
152 (2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the
153 contrary, any identifying information collected under the
154 authority of this subsection shall not be considered public
155 information and shall not be subject to a request for public
156 records made under chapter 610.
157 [9.] 10. A school [district] may revoke the
158 designation of [a person] an individual as a school
159 protection officer for any reason and shall immediately
160 notify the designated school protection officer in writing
161 of the revocation. The school district shall also within

SB 886 9
162 thirty days of the revocation notify the director of the
163 department of public safety in writing of the revocation of
164 the designation of such [person] individual as a school
165 protection officer. [A person] An individual who has had
166 the designation of school protection officer revoked has no
167 right to appeal the revocation decision.
168 [10.] 11. The director of the department of public
169 safety shall maintain a listing of all [persons] individuals
170 designated by [school districts] schools as school
171 protection officers and shall make this list available to
172 all law enforcement agencies.
173 [11.] 12. Before a school [district] may designate a
174 [teacher or administrator as a] school protection officer,
175 the school board of the school district or governing body of
176 the charter school or private school shall hold a public
177 hearing on whether to allow such designation. Notice of the
178 hearing shall be published at least fifteen days before the
179 date of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation
180 within the city or county in which the school district,
181 charter school, or private school is located. The board may
182 determine at a closed meeting, as "closed meeting" is
183 defined under section 610.010, whether to authorize the
184 [designated school protection officer to carry a concealed
185 firearm or a self-defense spray device] individual to serve
186 the school district, charter school, or private school as a
187 school protection officer.
188 13. Each school shall ensure that all students
189 enrolled full-time or part-time in grades prekindergarten
190 through grade eight participate in a mandatory, annual Eddie
191 Eagle Gunsafe training course on firearm safety provided by
192 the National Rifle Association.

SB 886 10
590.207. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, any person designated as a school protection
officer under the provisions of section 160.665 who allows
any such firearm out of [his or her] such officer's personal
control while that firearm is on the school [property]
campus as provided under [subsection 2 of] section 160.665
shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor and may be subject
to employment termination proceedings within the school
[district] if such school protection officer is an
elementary or secondary school teacher or administrator or
dismissal if such school protection officer is a volunteer
under section 160.665.
✓